Utah statutes.
11-21-1.   Cities and counties to require licensing of cycles by dealers -- "Cycle" defined.

(1) All county, city and town governments shall by ordinance or otherwise require all cycle dealers operating within their jurisdiction:

(a)  to license, or arrange to have licensed at the time of purchase all cycles sold by them;

(b)  to keep records on all cycles sold and to furnish, within 30 days of sale, their respective city or county police departments with the following information:

(i)  name and address of the retailer;

(ii)  year and make of the cycle;

(iii)  general description of the cycle;

(iv)  frame number; and

(v)  name and address of the purchaser;

(c)  to not sell any cycle which does not have a serial number on its frame.  Where the cycle has no serial or frame numbers the dealer shall be required to stamp or have stamped on the frame the number of the license to be issued for that cycle, the year in which the license was issued or year of expiration of license and the abbreviation for the city or county regulating the dealer.

(2)  As used in this section, "cycle" means a device upon which any person may ride, propelled by human power through a belt, chain or gears and having one or more wheels in tandem or other arrangement.  Cycles with wheels of at least 20 inches in diameter and frame size of at least 14 inches shall be subject to this section.  Others may be licensed by owner upon request.

